Utah statutes.
41-12a-407.   Certificate of self-funded coverage as proof of owner's or
operator's security.
(1)  The department may, upon the application of any person, issue a
certificate of self-funded coverage when it is satisfied that the person has:
(a)  more than 24 motor vehicles; and
(b)  deposits, in a form approved by the department, securities in an amount
of $200,000 plus $100 for each motor vehicle up to and including 1,000 motor
vehicles and $50 for every motor vehicle over 1,000 motor vehicles.
(2)  Persons holding a certificate of self-funded coverage under this chapter
shall pay benefits to persons injured from the self-funded person's operation,
maintenance, and use of motor vehicles as would an insurer issuing a policy to
the self-funded person containing the coverages under Section 31A-22-302.
(3)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act,
the department may, upon reasonable grounds, cancel the certificate.  Failure
to pay any judgment up to the limit under Subsection 31A-22-304(2) within 30
days after the judgment is final is a reasonable ground to cancel the
certificate.
(4)  Any government entity with self-funded coverage for government-owned
motor vehicles under Title 63G, Chapter 7, Governmental Immunity Act of Utah,
meets the requirements of this section.
